Georgia, session 2025_26, HB573.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 21A of Title 33 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to Medicaid care
management organizations, is amended by revising paragraph (6) of Code Section 33-21A-2,
relating to definitions, as follows:
(6) 'Health care services' has the same meaning as in paragraph (5) of Code Section
33-21-1 means any services included in the furnishing to any individual of medical care
or hospitalization or incident to the furnishing of such care or hospitalization, as well as
the furnishing to any person of any and all other services for the purpose of preventing,
alleviating, curing, or healing human illness or injury. Such term shall not include dental
services.
H. B. 573
- 1 -

LC 46 1114
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by repealing and reserving Code Section 33-21A-8, relating
to participation by dentists.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 573
- 2 -